Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2669.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5121HV (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2669 Section 1. Section 321.189, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 10. Autism spectrum disorder Nonapparent disability 3 status. A licensee who has a nonapparent disability, 4 including autism spectrum disorder, as defined in section 5 514C.28 , a mental disability, as defined in section 915.37, a 6 developmental disability, as defined in section 335.25, or any 7 other intellectual disability, may request that the license 8 be marked to reflect the licenseeâs autism spectrum disorder 9 nonapparent disability status on the face of the license when 10 the licensee applies for the issuance or renewal of a license. 11 A licensee may choose to have the face of the personâs license 12 marked with a butterfly design approved by the department, or 13 in a manner the department determines is sufficient to signify 14 the person has a nonapparent disability. The department may 15 adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing criteria under 16 which a license may be marked, including requiring the licensee 17 to submit medical proof of the licenseeâs autism spectrum 18 disorder nonapparent disability status. When a driverâs 19 license is so marked, the licenseeâs autism spectrum disorder 20 nonapparent disability status shall be noted in the electronic 21 database used by the department and law enforcement to access 22 registration, titling, and driverâs license information. The 23 department, in consultation with the department of health 24 and human services, shall develop educational media to raise 25 awareness of a licenseeâs ability to request the license be 26 marked to reflect the licenseeâs autism spectrum disorder 27 nonapparent disability status. 28 Sec. 2. Section 321.190, subsection 1, paragraph b, 29 subparagraph (6), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 30 (6) An applicant for a nonoperatorâs identification 31 card who has autism spectrum disorder, as defined in section 32 514C.28 a nonapparent disability, as described in section 33 321.189, subsection 10 , may request that the card be marked to 34 reflect the applicantâs autism spectrum disorder nonapparent 35 -1- LSB 5121HV (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2669 disability status on the face of the card when the applicant 1 applies for the issuance or renewal of a card. An applicant 2 may choose to have the face of the personâs card marked with 3 a butterfly design approved by the department, or in a manner 4 the department determines is sufficient to signify the person 5 has a nonapparent disability. The department may adopt rules 6 pursuant to chapter 17A establishing criteria under which a 7 card may be marked, including requiring the applicant to submit 8 medical proof of the applicantâs autism spectrum disorder 9 nonapparent disability status. The department, in consultation 10 with the department of health and human services, shall develop 11 educational media to raise awareness of an applicantâs ability 12 to request the card be marked to reflect the applicantâs autism 13 spectrum disorder nonapparent disability status. 14 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies on and after March 15 1, 2027, or the date the department of transportation submits 16 to the Iowa administrative code editor for publication in the 17 Iowa administrative bulletin a statement by the director of 18 transportation that the applicable phase of the department of 19 transportationâs new records system is implemented, whichever 20 is earlier. The department shall also forward a copy of the 21 statement to the Iowa Code editor. 22